Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1206.02
Community paramedic practice of emergency medical care, defined.

Community paramedic practice of emergency medical care means care provided by an advanced emergency medical technician, emergency medical technician, emergency medical technician-intermediate, or paramedic in accordance with the knowledge and skill acquired through successful completion of an approved program for a community paramedic at the respective licensure classification of the emergency care provider except for an emergency medical responder. Such care includes, but is not limited to, (1) the provision of telephone triage, advice, or other assistance to nonurgent 911 calls, (2) the provision of assistance or education to patients with chronic disease management, including posthospital discharge followup to prevent hospital admission or readmission, and (3) all of the acts that the respective licensure classification of an emergency care provider is authorized to perform.

Laws 2020, LB1002, § 16.